modules/home-manager/programs/neovim/spell/en.utf-8.add.aff
SET utf-8

PFX U Y 1
PFX U   0     un         .

PFX B Y 1
PFX B   0     sub        .

PFX O Y 1
PFX O   0     co         .

PFX N Y 1
PFX N   0     contra     .

PFX Q Y 1
PFX Q   0     equi       .

SFX S Y 4
SFX S   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX S   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX S   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX S   0     s          [^sxzhy]

SFX M Y 1
SFX M   0     's         .

SFX Y Y 1
SFX Y   0     ly         .

SFX T Y 1
SFX T   0     ity        .

SFX C Y 2
SFX C   sm    c          ism
SFX C   y     ic         opy
